New York, session 2025-2026, S3895.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 2 of section 27-b of the labor 2 law, as amended by chapter 351 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 a. "Employer" means: (1) the state; (2) a political subdivision of the 5 state; (3) a public authority, a public benefit corporation, or any 6 other governmental agency or instrumentality thereof; [and] (4) an 7 authorized agency as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision ten of 8 section three hundred seventy-one of the social services law that 9 accepts children adjudicated delinquent under article three of the fami- 10 ly court act; and (5) a not-for-profit corporation, as defined in para- 11 graph (a) of section one hundred two of the not-for-profit corporation 12 law, who received at least fifty percent of their budget through govern- 13 ment sources. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06567-01-5